Massachusetts, session 194th, H716.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 102. (a) A school shall employ a minimum number, as determined by the
department pursuant to subsection (b), of school adjustment counselors, certified by the
commissioner pursuant to section 38G.
(b) The department shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, which shall
include criteria for the minimum number of school adjustment counselors that a school shall
employ, which shall include: (i) the number of students enrolled in the school; (ii) whether the
school has Title I status; and (iii) any mitigating circumstances as detailed by the school
committee.
(c) For schools without sufficient funds to meet the requirements of subsection (a), the
department shall provide funding for the additional required school adjustment counselors.
of 2

SECTION 2. Not later than February 1, 2026, the department of elementary and
secondary education shall promulgate any regulations necessary to implement section 102 of
chapter 71 of the General Laws, inserted by section 1.
SECTION 3. Section 1 shall take effect on August 1, 2026.
of 2